Connecticut, session 2026, SB00345.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General
Assembly convened:
Section 1. Section 31-40w of the general statutes is repealed and the
following is substituted in lieu thereof (Effective October 1, 2026):
(a) [Any employee may, at her discretion,] An employer shall provide
a reasonable break time for an employee to express breast milk for such
employee's nursing child or breastfeed on site at [her] such employee's
workplace [during her meal or break period] each time such employee
has the need to express breast milk or breastfeed.
(b) An employer shall make reasonable efforts to provide a room or
other location, in close proximity to the work area, other than a toilet
stall, where the employee can express [her] such employee's milk in
private, and provided there is no undue hardship, such room or other
location shall (1) be free from intrusion and shielded from the public
SB345 / File No. 351 1

SB345 File No. 351
while such employee expresses breast milk, (2) include or be situated
near a refrigerator or employee-provided portable cold storage device
in which the employee can store [her] such employee's breast milk, and
(3) include access to an electrical outlet.
(c) An employer shall not discriminate against, discipline or take any
adverse employment action against any employee because such
employee has elected to exercise [her] such employee's rights under
subsection (a) of this section.
(d) As used in this section, "employer" means a person engaged in
business who has one or more employees, including the state and any
political subdivision of the state; "employee" means any person engaged
in service to an employer in the business of the employer; "reasonable
efforts" means any effort that would not impose an undue hardship on
the operation of the employer's business; and "undue hardship" means
any action that requires significant difficulty or expense when
considered in relation to factors such as the size of the business, its
financial resources and the nature and structure of its operation.
Sec. 2. Subdivision (2) of section 31-76b of the general statutes is
repealed and the following is substituted in lieu thereof (Effective October
1, 2026):
(2) (A) "Hours worked" [include] includes all time during which an
employee is required by the employer to be on the employer's premises
or to be on duty, or to be at the prescribed work place, and all time
during which an employee is employed or permitted to work, whether
or not required to do so, provided time allowed for meals shall be
excluded unless the employee is required or permitted to work. Such
time includes, but shall not be limited to, (i) the time when an employee
is required to wait on the premises while no work is provided by the
employer, and (ii) the time an employee spends in security screenings
required by an employer. (B) All time during which an employee is
required to be on call for emergency service at a location designated by
the employer shall be considered to be working time and shall be paid
for as such, whether or not the employee is actually called upon to work.
SB345 / File No. 351 2

SB345 File No. 351
(C) When an employee is subject to call for emergency service but is not
required to be at a location designated by the employer but is simply
required to keep the employer informed as to the location at which he
may be contacted, or when an employee is not specifically required by
his employer to be subject to call but is contacted by his employer or on
the employer's authorization directly or indirectly and assigned to duty,
working time shall begin when the employee is notified of his
assignment and shall end when the employee has completed his
assignment. (D) Notwithstanding the provisions of this subdivision,
when an individual employed by a third-party provider to provide
"companionship services", as defined in the regulations of the federal
Fair Labor Standards Act, is required to be present at a worksite for a
period of not less than twenty-four consecutive hours, such individual
and his or her employer may agree in writing to exclude a regularly
scheduled sleeping period of not more than eight hours from hours
worked, provided (i) adequate on-site sleeping facilities are furnished
to such individual, and (ii) such individual receives at least five hours
of sleep time. If the scheduled sleeping period is more than eight hours,
only eight hours will be excluded. If the scheduled sleeping period is
interrupted by an assignment to work, the interruption shall be counted
as hours worked. If such individual does not receive at least five hours
of sleep time during the scheduled sleeping period, the entire sleeping
period shall be considered hours worked. The provisions of this
subparagraph shall be effective on and after the effective date of the
United States Department of Labor's Final Rule concerning the
Application of the federal Fair Labor Standards Act to Domestic Service
published in the Federal Register of October 1, 2013;
Sec. 3. (Effective from passage) (a) There is established a task force to
study and provide recommendations on the establishment of heat safety
standards for workplaces. The study shall include, but need not be
limited to, an examination of (1) best practices to prevent employee
exposure to the risk of heat illness, and (2) laws and regulations
governing heat safety standards implemented in other states.
(b) The task force shall consist of the following members:
SB345 / File No. 351 3

SB345 File No. 351
(1) The chairpersons and ranking members of the joint standing
committee of the General Assembly having cognizance of matters
relating to labor and public employees, or their designees;
(2) One appointed by the speaker of the House of Representatives,
who is a member of an organization that advocates for the prevention
of sudden death from exertional heat stroke;
(3) One appointed by the president pro tempore of the Senate;
(4) One appointed by the majority leader of the House of
Representatives;
(5) One appointed by the majority leader of the Senate;
(6) One appointed by the minority leader of the House of
Representatives;
(7) One appointed by the minority leader of the Senate; and
(8) The Labor Commissioner, or the commissioner's designee.
(c) Any member of the task force appointed under subdivision (2),
(3), (4), (5), (6) or (7) of subsection (b) of this section may be a member
of the General Assembly.
(d) All initial appointments to the task force shall be made not later
than thirty days after the effective date of this section. Any vacancy shall
be filled by the appointing authority.
100 (e) The chairpersons of the joint standing committee of the General
101 Assembly having cognizance of matters relating to labor and public
102 employees, or their designees, shall be the chairpersons of the task force.
103 Such chairpersons shall schedule the first meeting of the task force,
104 which shall be held not later than sixty days after the effective date of
105 this section.
106 (f) The administrative staff of the joint standing committee of the
107 General Assembly having cognizance of matters relating to labor and
SB345 / File No. 351 4

SB345 File No. 351
108 public employees shall serve as administrative staff of the task force.
109 (g) Not later than January 1, 2027, the task force shall submit a report
110 on its findings and recommendations to the joint standing committee of
111 the General Assembly having cognizance of matters relating to labor
112 and public employees, in accordance with the provisions of section 11-
113 4a of the general statutes. The task force shall terminate on the date that
114 it submits such report or January 1, 2027, whichever is later.
This act shall take effect as follows and shall amend the following
sections:
Section 1 October 1, 2026 31-40w
Sec. 2 October 1, 2026 31-76b(2)
Sec. 3 from passage New section
LAB Joint Favorable
SB345 / File No. 351 5

SB345 File No. 351
The following Fiscal Impact Statement and Bill Analysis are prepared for the benefit of the members of
the General Assembly, solely for purposes of information, summarization and explanation and do not
represent the intent of the General Assembly or either chamber thereof for any purpose. In general,
fiscal impacts are based upon a variety of informational sources, including the analyst’s professional
knowledge. Whenever applicable, agency data is consulted as part of the analysis, however final
products do not necessarily reflect an assessment from any specific department.
OFA Fiscal Note
State Impact:
Agency Affected Fund-Effect FY 27 $ FY 28 $
Labor Dept. GF - Potential Minimal Minimal
Revenue Gain
Note: GF=General Fund
Municipal Impact: None
Explanation
The bill makes modifications to breastfeeding in the workplace
regulations, the definition of "hours worked" with regard to security
screenings, and it establishes a task force to study heat safety standards.
This results in a potential minimal revenue gain to the Department of
Labor (DOL) starting in FY 27.
Section 1 requires employers to provide reasonable break time for
breastfeeding employees. This results in a potential minimal revenue
gain from civil penalties to the extent violations are found, and penalties
are paid1.
Section 2 modifies the definition of "hours worked" to include the
time an employee spends in security screenings required by an
employer. This does not result in any fiscal impact as the DOL already
recognizes and enforces time spent in security screenings as hours
worked.
Section 3 establishes a task force to study heat safety standards for
Under current law, the Department of Labor can assess a civil penalty of $300. There
have not been civil penalties collected over the past few years.
SB345 / File No. 351 6

SB345 File No. 351
workplaces. This does not result in any fiscal impact to the state as
members have the necessary expertise to carry out the requirements of
this section.
The Out Years
The annualized ongoing fiscal impact identified above would
continue into the future subject to violations found and penalties paid.
SB345 / File No. 351 7

SB345 File No. 351
OLR Bill Analysis
SB 345
AN ACT CONCERNING BREASTFEEDING IN THE WORKPLACE,
PRE AND POST-SHIFT HOURS AND ESTABLISHING A TASK
FORCE TO STUDY WORKPLACE HEAT SAFETY STANDARDS.